Washington statutes.
RCW 13.38.110

Right to counsel.

In any child custody proceeding under this chapter in which the court determines the Indian child's parent or Indian custodian is indigent, the parent or Indian custodian shall have the right to court-appointed counsel. The court may, in its discretion, appoint counsel for the Indian child upon a finding that the appointment is in the best interests of the Indian child.

[ 2011 c 309 s 11.]